Washington statutes.
RCW 16.68.030

Sale, gift, or conveyance prohibited—Exceptions.

It is unlawful for any person to sell, offer for sale, or give away a dead animal or convey the same along any public road or land not his or her own: PROVIDED, That dead animals may be sold or given away to and legally transported on highways by a person having an unrevoked, annual license to operate a rendering plant or by a person having an unrevoked, annual license to operate as an independent collector.

[ 2011 c 336 s 439; 1949 c 100 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3142-3.]